District of Columbia statutes.
21-2107

Construction of power relating to commodity and option transactions.

In a statutory power of attorney the language granting power with respect to commodity and option transactions empowers the agent to buy, sell, exchange, assign, settle, and exercise commodity futures contracts and call and put options on stocks and stock indexes traded on a regulated option exchange, and establish, continue, modify, and terminate option accounts with a broker.

History

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-147, § 2, 45 DCR 3853

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-2107.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 7 of the Uniform Statutory Form Power of Attorney Act.